Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COALITION OF ASIAN AMERICAN LEADERS FOR ASIAN HISTORY.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to the Coalition of Asian American Leaders to document unheard stories of Asian Minnesotans to educate the public about the history of Asian migration to Minnesota and experiences of Asian Americans in Minnesota. The appropriation supports research, translation and interpretation, project staffing, community outreach, production, and marketing. The Coalition of Asian American Leaders may provide grant funding to project partners to support the documentation of stories within ethnically specific Asian Minnesotan communities. new text end